Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,270
Swimming pools; failure to comply with requirements; enforcement, penalties, or other remedies; established by local government.

Any owner or operator of a swimming pool failing to maintain a certificate of competency as required by section 81-15,268 or failing to comply with the minimum sanitary and safety requirements established by the local government exercising jurisdiction over such swimming pool shall be subject to enforcement, penalties, or other remedies as established by such local government.

Laws 1969, c. 760, § 7, p. 2877;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 71-4307;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 10;

Laws 2026, LB759, § 30.
July 18, 2026